Texas, session 891, SB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 247.073(j), Health and Safety Code, as added by H.B. 3595, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is repealed. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.